Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201283-1,112.01
Person convicted of multiple
violations of driving under influence of alcoholic liquor or drugs; parole
eligibility.

The
board shall require any person who is incarcerated pursuant to subdivision
(9) or (10) of section 60-6,197.03 to complete all diagnostic evaluations
provided by the department and all programming required by the department
prior to being considered eligible for parole.

Laws 2011, LB675, § 12.